Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-803
Applicability of law.

The provisions of the Conciliation Court Law shall be applicable only in counties in which the county court and the district court determines that the social conditions in the county and the number of domestic relations cases in the courts render the procedures provided in such law necessary to the full and proper consideration of such cases and the effectuation of the purposes of such law. Such determination shall be made annually in the month of December.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 3, p. 654;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 22.

The Conciliation Court Law is not applicable in counties in which the district court has failed to find the procedures therein provided for to be necessary. Condreay v. Condreay, 190 Neb. 513, 209 N.W.2d 357 (1973).